District of Columbia statutes.
44-632

Expired

Hospital Fund.

Expired.

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 5013, 57 DCR 6242
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1103 of Fiscal Year 2010 Balanced Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-531, August 6, 2010, 57 DCR 8109).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5013 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1103 of Fiscal Year 2010 Balanced Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-450, June 28, 2010, 57 DCR 5635).
Section 2002(b) of D.C. Law 18-222 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
“(c) All funds deposited in the Hospital Fund, and any interest earned on those funds, shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time, but shall be continually available for the purpose set forth in subsection (a) of this section without regard to fiscal year limitation, subject to authorization by Congress.”
“(4) Other amounts collected under this act.
“(3) Matching federal funds on assessments; and
“(2) Interest and penalties collected under this act;
“(1) Assessments collected under this act;
“(b) There shall be deposited into the Hospital Fund:
“(a) There is established as a nonlapsing fund the Hospital Fund, which shall be used solely to fund District State Medicaid services.
“Sec. 1103. Hospital Fund.
Section 1103 of D.C. Law 18-222 added a section to read as follows:
This section is referenced in § 44-633.